Florida, session 2026, SB6.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 174 175 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 176 found and declared to be true. 177 Section 2.âThe sum of $3.8 million is appropriated from the 178 General Revenue Fund to the Department of Children and Families 179 for the relief of L.E. for injuries and damages sustained as a 180 result of the negligence of the department. 181 Section 3.âThe Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw 182 a warrant in favor of L.E., payable to the irrevocable trust 183 which has already been created for the exclusive use and benefit 184 of L.E., in the sum of $3.8 million upon funds of the Department 185 of Children and Families in the State Treasury and to pay the 186 same out of such funds in the State Treasury. 187 Section 4.âThe amount paid by the Department of Children 188 and Families pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the 189 amount awarded under this act are intended to provide the sole 190 compensation for all present and future claims against the 191 department arising out of the factual situation described in 192 this act which resulted in injuries and damages to L.E. The 193 total amount paid for attorney fees relating to this claim 194 against the department may not exceed 25 percent of the total 195 amount awarded under this act. 196 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.